Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Chapter 30. Controlled Substances.

Collateral references. —

28 C.J.S., Drugs and Narcotics, § 1 et seq.

Construction or provision of Uniform Narcotic Drug Act or similar statute dealing with obtaining or procuring the administration of a narcotic drug by fraud or deceit. 25 ALR3d 1118.

Criminality of act of directing to, or recommending, source from which illicit drugs may be purchased. 34 ALR5th 125.